grammars/class.verbs.weighted.lexc
LEXICON Misc1PreBase
[ADV.again]:yawoyh^ Misc1PreBase  "weight: 6.089566565925496" ;              ! again
[ADV.again]:yawoh^ Misc1PreBase  "weight: 6.089566565925496" ;               ! again
[ADV.together]:djorrk^ Misc1PreBase  "weight: 5.771493279932342" ;           ! together
[ADV.together]:djarrk^ Misc1PreBase  "weight: 5.771493279932342" ;           ! together
[ADV.again][ADV.together]:yawoyhdjarrk^ Misc1PreBase "weight: 12.952324478976898" ; ! again together
[ADV.a.bit]:woh^ Misc1PreBase  "weight: 6.9608599318689155" ;                 ! a bit
[ADV.at.night]:kak^ Misc1PreBase  "weight: 9.620119968801694" ;              ! at night
[ADV.differently]:barrkid^ Misc1PreBase  "weight: 12.952324478976898" ;       ! differently
[ADV.properly]:wernh^ Misc1PreBase  "weight: 6.170132422970106" ;            ! properly
[ADV.vigorously]:ngudj^ Misc1PreBase  "weight: 8.486416360322314" ;          ! vigorously
[ADV.in.fear]:kele^ Misc1PreBase  "weight: 7.852458051152699" ;              ! in fear
[ADV.wrong]:warrebu^ Misc1PreBase  "weight: 12.952324478976898" ;             ! wrong
[ADJ.wounded]:ngoreng^ Misc1PreBase  "weight: 10.872882937297062" ;           ! do V while wounded
[ADJ.similar]:rohrouk^ Misc1PreBase  "weight: 9.733448654108697" ;           ! similar
[ADJ.similar]:rohrok^ Misc1PreBase  "weight: 9.733448654108697" ;            ! similar (alternate spelling)
[ADJ.cooked]:djoleng^ Misc1PreBase  "weight: 10.755099901640678" ;
[ASP.now]:bad^ Misc1PreBase  "weight: 8.982032565424776" ;                   ! now
[ASP.now][ADV.again]:badyawoyh^ Misc1PreBase  "weight: 12.952324478976898" ;       ! now again
[ASP.now][ADV.again]:badyawoh^ Misc1PreBase  "weight: 12.952324478976898" ;       ! now again
[ASP.before]:yingkih^ Misc1PreBase  "weight: 6.356543965015586" ;            ! before
[ASP.almost]:kuyin^ Misc1PreBase  "weight: 9.368805540520787" ;              ! almost
[ASP.nearly]:barlanh^ Misc1PreBase  "weight: 10.554429206178527" ;            ! nearly
[QUANT.each]:bebbeh^ Misc1PreBase  "weight: 6.735718377892033" ;             ! bebbeh
[QUANT.only]:djal^ Misc1PreBase  "weight: 4.36132336041594" ;               ! only
[QUANT.only][ADV.a.bit]:djalwoh^ Misc1PreBase  "weight: 12.952324478976898" ;      ! only a bit
[QUANT.many]:mirnde^ Misc1PreBase  "weight: 6.9608599318689155" ;             ! many
0:0 BenefactPreBase ;

LEXICON BenefactPreBase                         ! benefactive infix makes the verb transitive
0:0 Misc2PreBase ;
@P.VALENCE.AUGM@[BEN]:@P.VALENCE.AUGM@marne^ Misc2PreBase  "weight: 3.584809432628716" ;

LEXICON Misc2PreBase
[QUANT.only]:djal^ AspPreBase2  "weight: 4.36132336041594" ;
[QUANT.close.up]:darnh^ GINPreBase  "weight: 8.762669736950471" ;
[QUANT.small]:yaw^ AspPreBase2  "weight: 6.950909601015748" ;
[QUANT.each]:bebbeh^ AspPreBase2  "weight: 6.735718377892033" ;             ! bebbeh
[QUANT.many]:mirnde^ AspPreBase2  "weight: 6.9608599318689155" ;             ! many
0:0 GINPreBase ;

LEXICON AspPreBase2
[IMM]:h^ GINPreBase  "weight: 4.334743113529392" ;
0:0 GINPreBase ;

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!!                                     !!
!!   INCORPORATED NOUNS                !!
!!                                     !!
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
LEXICON GINPreBase
[GIN]:0 NounBase  "weight: 3.424549076399586" ;
0 BPINPreBase ;

LEXICON BPINPreBase ! names also fall into this category: any attributes of the person.
[BPIN]:balem^ AdjPreBase  "weight: 4.704842474691205" ;
[BPIN]:bard^ AdjPreBase  "weight: 4.704842474691205" ;
[BPIN]:berd^ AdjPreBase  "weight: 4.704842474691205" ;
[BPIN]:berl^ AdjPreBase  "weight: 4.704842474691205" ;
[BPIN]:berre^ AdjPreBase  "weight: 4.704842474691205" ;
[BPIN]:bodme^ AdjPreBase  "weight: 4.704842474691205" ;
[BPIN]:bid^ AdjPreBase  "weight: 4.704842474691205" ;
[BPIN]:bininj^ AdjPreBase  "weight: 4.704842474691205" ;
[BPIN]:dad^ AdjPreBase  "weight: 4.704842474691205" ;
[BPIN]:dang^ AdjPreBase  "weight: 4.704842474691205" ;
[BPIN]:dedj^ AdjPreBase  "weight: 4.704842474691205" ;
[BPIN]:denge^ AdjPreBase  "weight: 4.704842474691205" ;
[BPIN]:rrenge^ AdjPreBase  "weight: 4.704842474691205" ;
[BPIN]:dile^ AdjPreBase  "weight: 4.704842474691205" ;
[BPIN]:djen^ AdjPreBase  "weight: 4.704842474691205" ;                                          ! tongue
[BPIN]:djikka^ AdjPreBase  "weight: 4.704842474691205" ;
[BPIN]:kanem^ AdjPreBase  "weight: 4.704842474691205" ;
[BPIN]:keb^ AdjPreBase  "weight: 4.704842474691205" ;
[BPIN]:kodj^ AdjPreBase  "weight: 4.704842474691205" ;
[BPIN]:kom^ AdjPreBase  "weight: 4.704842474691205" ;
[BPIN]:kord^ AdjPreBase  "weight: 4.704842474691205" ;
[BPIN]:kuk^ AdjPreBase  "weight: 4.704842474691205" ;
[BPIN]:kurlah^ AdjPreBase  "weight: 4.704842474691205" ;
[BPIN]:kurlh^ AdjPreBase  "weight: 4.704842474691205" ;
[BPIN]:milh^ AdjPreBase  "weight: 4.704842474691205" ;
[BPIN]:mim^ AdjPreBase  "weight: 4.704842474691205" ;
[BPIN]:murrng^ AdjPreBase  "weight: 4.704842474691205" ;
[BPIN]:njam^ AdjPreBase  "weight: 4.704842474691205" ;
[BPIN]:nuk^ AdjPreBase  "weight: 4.704842474691205" ;
[BPIN]:rrulkki^ AdjPreBase  "weight: 4.704842474691205" ;                                    ! internal.sick
[BPIN]:yidme^ AdjPreBase  "weight: 4.704842474691205" ;
0:0 SPAPreBase ;

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!!                                     !!
!!   POST-NOMINAL SLOTS                !!
!!                                     !!
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
LEXICON AdjPreBase
[ADJ.tight]:djokko^ SPAPreBase  "weight: 12.952324478976898" ;
[ADJ.big]:kimuk^ SPAPreBase  "weight: 12.952324478976898" ;
[QUANT.many]:wern^ SPAPreBase  "weight: 6.9608599318689155" ;
0:0 SPAPreBase ;

LEXICON SPAPreBase
0:0 COMPreBase ;    ! Spatial slot in Evans' grammar had no examples in Kunwinjku, so this is a pass-through for now

LEXICON COMPreBase
0:0 VerbValencyCheck ;
@P.VALENCE.AUGM@[COM]:@P.VALENCE.AUGM@yi^ VerbValencyCheck  "weight: 4.568205641786002" ;

LEXICON VerbValencyCheck
@R.VALENCE.AUGM@ AllVerbs ;
@R.VALENCE.INTR@ IntransitiveVerbs ;
@R.VALENCE.TRNS@ TransitiveVerbs ; 

LEXICON AllVerbs
0:0 IntransitiveVerbs ;
0:0 TransitiveVerbs ; 

LEXICON anyVerbPostBase
0:0 V1PostBase ;
0:0 V2PostBase ;
0:0 V3aPostBase ;
0:0 V3bPostBase ;
0:0 V3cPostBase ;
0:0 V3dPostBase ;
0:0 V4aPostBase ;
0:0 V4bPostBase ;
0:0 V5aPostBase ;
0:0 V5bPostBase ;
0:0 V5cPostBase ;
0:0 V6aPostBase ;
0:0 V7aPostBase ;
0:0 V8PostBase ;
0:0 V9PostBase ;
0:0 V10PostBase ;
0:0 V11PostBase ;
0:0 ReVerbs ;
0:0 NonverbalPostBase ;

LEXICON V1PostBase
[RR]:rre^ RRConj  "weight: 4.596944583723264" ;
[PERSIST]:~iyindi^ PERSISTSConj  "weight: 5.73561499226744" ;   
0:0 V1Conj ;

LEXICON V1Conj
@R.TENSE.NP@[NonPst]:@R.TENSE.NP@0^ #  "weight: 2.4315184283770575" ;
@R.TENSE.P@[PstPerf]:@R.TENSE.P@ng^ #  "weight: 2.6188743467322175" ;
@R.TENSE.P@[PstImperf]:@R.TENSE.P@ni^ #  "weight: 3.5563347601140856" ;
@R.TENSE.P@[PstImperf]:@R.TENSE.P@~i^ #  "weight: 3.5563347601140856" ;
[Imp]:n^ #  "weight: 2.6723201402884977" ;
[Irr]:+ninj^ #  "weight: 4.711939363460562" ;
[Irr]:ninj^ #  "weight: 4.711939363460562" ;

LEXICON V2PostBase
[RR]:rre^ RRConj  "weight: 4.596944583723264" ;
[PERSIST]:~indi^ PERSISTSConj  "weight: 5.73561499226744" ;
0:0 V2Conj ;

LEXICON V2Conj
@R.TENSE.NP@[NonPst]:@R.TENSE.NP@0^ #  "weight: 2.4315184283770575" ;
@R.TENSE.P@[PstPerf]:@R.TENSE.P@ng^ #  "weight: 2.6188743467322175" ;
@R.TENSE.P@[PstImperf]:@R.TENSE.P@ni^ #  "weight: 3.5563347601140856" ;
[Imp]:men^ #  "weight: 2.6723201402884977" ;
[Irr]:meninj^ #  "weight: 4.711939363460562" ; 

LEXICON V3aPostBase
[RR]:rre^ RRConj  "weight: 4.596944583723264" ;
[PERSIST]:yindi^ PERSISTSConj  "weight: 5.73561499226744" ;
0:0 V3aConj ;

LEXICON IntransitiveVerbs
bengdayhme:bengdayhme^ V1PostBase  "weight: 12.952324478976898" ;                             ! remember, realize
bengka:bengka^ V3aPostBase  "weight: 12.952324478976898" ;                                    ! understand, comprehend
burlurlhme:burlurlhme^ V1PostBase "weight: 12.952324478976898" ;                             ! Swell up
dimhme:dimhme^ V1PostBase  "weight: 12.952324478976898" ;
djangwe:djangwe^ V2PostBase  "weight: 12.952324478976898" ;
djudme:djudme^ V1PostBase  "weight: 12.952324478976898" ;                                     ! stick in
dolka:(rr)olka^ V3aPostBase  "weight: 12.952324478976898" ;                            ! get up
dubbe:dubbe^ V1PostBase  "weight: 12.952324478976898" ;                                      ! block
dulkkimanka:(rr)ulkimanka^ V3aPostBase  "weight: 12.952324478976898" ;
kewkme:kewkme^ V1PostBase "weight: 12.952324478976898" ; 
kombukdowe:kombukdowe^ V2PostBase  "weight: 12.952324478976898" ;
kukyime:kukyime^ V1PostBase  "weight: 12.952324478976898" ;
manka:manka^ V3aPostBase  "weight: 12.952324478976898" ;                              ! fall, land
menmenyime:menmenyime^ V1PostBase  "weight: 12.952324478976898" ;
ngeyhme:ngeyhme^ V1PostBase "weight: 12.952324478976898" ;                            ! moan
njudjme:njudme^ V1PostBase  "weight: 12.952324478976898" ;                                     !
roka:roka^ V3aPostBase  "weight: 12.952324478976898" ;
wake:wake^ V2PostBase  "weight: 12.952324478976898" ;                                       ! crawl, walk
welhwelhme:welhwelhme^ V1PostBase  "weight: 12.952324478976898" ;                                 ! hang (intr)
yerrka:yerrka^ V3aPostBase  "weight: 12.952324478976898" ;                                    ! sit
yerrkme:yerrkme^ V1PostBase  "weight: 12.952324478976898" ;
LEXICON TransitiveVerbs
balhme:balhme^ V1PostBase  "weight: 12.952324478976898" ;
barlke:barlke^ V2PostBase  "weight: 12.952324478976898" ;                                     ! fill
behke:behke^ V2PostBase  "weight: 12.952324478976898" ;
bernelka:bernelka^ V3aPostBase  "weight: 12.952324478976898" ;
bidbuyhwe:bidbuyhwe^ V2PostBase  "weight: 12.952324478976898" ;
bidjibme:bidjibme^ V1PostBase  "weight: 12.952324478976898" ;
birrka:birrka^ V3aPostBase  "weight: 12.952324478976898" ;
bolka:bolka^ V3aPostBase  "weight: 12.952324478976898" ;
borna:borna^ V2PostBase  "weight: 12.952324478976898" ;                                      ! beget (eg a child)
dabke:dabke^ V2PostBase  "weight: 12.952324478976898" ;
dakurrme:dakurrme^ V1PostBase  "weight: 12.952324478976898" ;
denghke:denghke^ V2PostBase  "weight: 12.952324478976898" ;
djangka:djangka^ V3aPostBase  "weight: 12.952324478976898" ;                                   ! hunt
djorrngme:djorrngme^ V1PostBase  "weight: 12.952324478976898" ;
djowkke:djowkke^ V2PostBase  "weight: 12.952324478976898" ;                                    ! cross over
dokmiwe:dokmiwe^ V2PostBase  "weight: 12.952324478976898" ;
duhke:duhke^ V2PostBase  "weight: 12.952324478976898" ;
dukka:(rr)ukka^ V3aPostBase  "weight: 12.952324478976898" ;                            ! tie up, wrap up, put handcuffs on
ka:ka^ V3aPostBase  "weight: 12.952324478976898" ;                                        ! take, carry along
kan:kan^ V3aPostBase  "weight: 12.952324478976898" ;
kodjdjobke:kodjdjobke^ V2PostBase  "weight: 12.952324478976898" ;                                 ! 
kukburriweke:kukburriweke^ V2PostBase  "weight: 12.952324478976898" ;                               ! throw down, 2. hit an animal while hunting
manjbekka:manjbekka^ V3aPostBase  "weight: 12.952324478976898" ;
marnebebme:marnebebme^ V1PostBase  "weight: 12.952324478976898" ;
morneka:morneka^ V3aPostBase  "weight: 12.952324478976898" ;
ngaduhge:ngaduhge^ V2PostBase  "weight: 12.952324478976898" ;                                   ! fire up, alternate spelling
ngehke:ngehke^ V2PostBase  "weight: 12.952324478976898" ;
ngunjdjikka:ngunjdjikka^ V3aPostBase  "weight: 12.952324478976898" ;
wayhke:wayhke^ V2PostBase  "weight: 12.952324478976898" ;                                     ! lift
werrhme:werrhme^ V1PostBase  "weight: 12.952324478976898" ;
worrumbokka:worrumbokka^ V3aPostBase  "weight: 12.952324478976898" ;
yarlarrke:yarlarrke^ V2PostBase  "weight: 12.952324478976898" ;
